North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 15. State Land Fund.

§ 146-71.
State Land Fund created.

The State Land Fund, which is hereby created, shall consist of the moneys required by this Chapter to be paid into that fund, together with such amounts as the General Assembly may appropriate thereto.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-72.
Purpose.

The State Land Fund may, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved by the Council of State, be used for the following purposes:

To pay any expenses incurred in carrying out the duties and responsibilities created by the provisions of this Chapter.

For the acquisition of land, when appropriation is made for that purpose by the General Assembly.

To pay any expenses incurred by the State Auditor in carrying out the duties and responsibilities created by G.S. 143-341.2(b)(3).

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1; 2016-119, s. 1(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-119, s. 1(d), effective July 28, 2016, added subdivision (3).

§ 146-73.
Administration.

The State Land Fund shall be administered by the Department of Administration, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved by the Council of State. All expenditures from the fund shall be made upon order of the Director of the Budget, or of the officer designated by him to issue such orders.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.